Utah statutes.
10-2-407.   Protest to annexation petition -- Township planning commission
recommendation -- Petition requirements -- Disposition of petition if no
protest filed.
(1) (a)  A protest to an annexation petition under Section 10-2-403 may be
filed by:
(i)  the legislative body or governing board of an affected entity; or
(ii)  for a proposed annexation of an area within a county of the first class,
the owners of private real property that:
(A)  is located in the unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area
proposed for annexation;
(B)  covers at least 25% of the private land area located in the
unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area proposed for annexation; and
(C)  is equal in value to at least 15% of all real property located in the
unincorporated area within 1/2 mile of the area proposed for annexation.
(b) (i)  A planning commission of a township located in a county of the first
class may recommend to the legislative body of the county in which the
township is located that the county legislative body file a protest against a
proposed annexation under this part of an area located within the township.
(ii) (A)  The township planning commission shall communicate each
recommendation under Subsection (1)(b)(i) in writing to the county legislative
body within 30 days after the city recorder or town clerk's certification of
the annexation petition under Subsection 10-2-405(2) (c)(i).
(B)  At the time the recommendation is communicated to the county legislative
body under Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(A), the township planning commission shall
mail or deliver a copy of the recommendation to the legislative body of the
proposed annexing municipality and to the contact sponsor.
(2) (a)  Each protest under Subsection (1)(a) shall:
(i)  be filed:
(A)  no later than 30 days after the municipal legislative body's receipt of
the notice of certification under Subsection 10-2-405(2)(c)(i); and
(B) (I)  in a county that has already created a commission under Section
10-2-409, with the commission; or
(II)  in a county that has not yet created a commission under Section
10-2-409, with the clerk of the county in which the area proposed for
annexation is located; and
(ii)  state each reason for the protest of the annexation petition and, if the
area proposed to be annexed is located in a specified county, justification
for the protest under the standards established in this chapter;
(iii)  if the area proposed to be annexed is located in a specified county,
contain other information that the commission by rule requires or that the
party filing the protest considers pertinent; and
(iv)  the name and address of a contact person who is to receive notices sent
by the commission with respect to the protest proceedings.
(b)  The party filing a protest under this section shall on the same date
deliver or mail a copy of the protest to the city recorder or town clerk of
the proposed annexing municipality.
(c)  Each clerk who receives a protest under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(B)(II)
shall:
(i)  immediately notify the county legislative body of the protest; and
(ii)  deliver the protest to the boundary commission within five days after:
(A)  receipt of the protest, if the boundary commission has previously been
created; or
(B)  creation of the boundary commission under Subsection 10-2-409(1)(b), if
the boundary commission has not previously been created.
(d)  Each protest of a proposed annexation of an area located in a county of
the first class under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) shall, in addition to the
requirements of Subsections (2)(a) and (b):
(i)  indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each
owner signing the protest; and
(ii)  designate one of the signers of the protest as the contact person and
state the mailing address of the contact person.
(3) (a) (i)  If a protest is filed under this section:
(A)  the municipal legislative body may, at its next regular meeting after
expiration of the deadline under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A), deny the annexation
petition; or
(B)  if the municipal legislative body does not deny the annexation petition
under Subsection (3)(a)(i)(A), the municipal legislative body may take no
further action on the annexation petition until after receipt of the
commission's notice of its decision on the protest under Section 10-2-416.
(ii)  If a municipal legislative body denies an annexation petition under
Subsection (3)(a)(i)(A), the municipal legislative body shall, within five
days after the denial, send notice of the denial in writing to:
(A)  the contact sponsor of the annexation petition;
(B)  the commission;
(C)  each entity that filed a protest;
(D)  if a protest was filed under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) for a proposed
annexation of an area located in a county of the first class, the contact
person; and
(E)  if any of the area proposed for annexation is within a township, the
legislative body of the county in which the township is located.
(b) (i)  If no timely protest is filed under this section, the municipal
legislative body may, subject to Subsection (3)(b)(ii), approve the petition.
(ii)  Before approving an annexation petition under Subsection (3)(b)(i), the
municipal legislative body shall:
(A)  hold a public hearing; and
(B)  at least seven days before the public hearing under Subsection
(3)(b)(ii)(A):
(I) (Aa)  publish notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation
within the municipality and the area proposed for annexation; or
(Bb)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation in those areas, post
written notices of the hearing in conspicuous places within those areas that
are most likely to give notice to residents within those areas; and
(II)  publish notice of the hearing in accordance with Section 45-1-101.
(iii)  Within ten days after approving an annexation under Subsection
(3)(b)(i) of an area that is partly or entirely within a township, the
municipal legislative body shall send notice of the approval to the
legislative body of the county in which the township is located.
